Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.038

County juvenile detention facilities—Policy—Detention and risk assessment standards.

(1) It is the policy of this state that all county juvenile detention facilities provide a humane, safe, and rehabilitative environment and that unadjudicated youth remain in the community whenever possible, consistent with public safety and the provisions of chapter 13.40 RCW.

(2) The counties shall develop and implement detention intake standards and risk assessment standards to determine whether detention is warranted, whether the juvenile is developmentally disabled, and if detention is warranted, whether the juvenile should be placed in secure, nonsecure, or home detention to implement the goals of this section.

(3) Inability to pay for a less restrictive detention placement shall not be a basis for denying a respondent a less restrictive placement in the community.

(4) The assessment standards to determine whether a juvenile entering detention is developmentally disabled must be developed and implemented no later than December 31, 2012.

[ 2012 c 120 s 1; 1992 c 205 s 105; 1986 c 288 s 7.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—1992 c 205: See notes following RCW 13.40.010.

Severability—1986 c 288: See note following RCW 43.185C.260.